Washington statutes.
RCW 18.34.050

Examining committee—Compensation and travel expenses.

The examining committee shall consist of three persons primarily engaged in the business of dispensing opticians and who currently hold a valid license under this chapter. Members of the committee shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 1984 c 287 s 32; 1957 c 43 s 5.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.